Wyoming, session 2025, HB0261.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-5-202(b)(i), (ii)(A) and (C) is
amended to read:

6-5-202. Accessory after the fact; penalties.

(b) An accessory after the fact commits:

HB0261

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0605
(i) A felony punishable by imprisonment for not
more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three
thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both, if:

(A) The crime is a felony that is not a
violent felony and the person acting as an accessory is not
a relative of the person committing the crime; or

(B) The crime is a violent felony.

(ii) A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment
for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than
seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if:

(A) The crime is a felony that is not a
violent felony and the person acting as an accessory is a
relative of the person committing the crime;

(C) The crime is a felony that is not a
violent felony and the principal is a minor.

HB0261

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0605
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0261